Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 3. Jurisdiction and Venue.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Abortion, § 1; 4A M.J. Commonwealth’s and State’s Attorney, § 4; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 69; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 13, 82, 84; 11B M.J. Jurisdiction, § 21.

§ 16.1-241.
Jurisdiction; consent for abortion.

The judges of the juvenile and domestic relations district court elected or appointed under this law shall be conservators of the peace within the corporate limits of the cities and the boundaries of the counties for which they are respectively chosen and within one mile beyond the limits of such cities and counties. Except as hereinafter provided, each juvenile and domestic relations district court shall have, within the limits of the territory for which it is created, exclusive original jurisdiction, and within one mile beyond the limits of said city or county, concurrent jurisdiction with the juvenile court or courts of the adjoining city or county, over all cases, matters and proceedings involving:

The custody, visitation, support, control or disposition of a child:

Who is alleged to be abused, neglected, in need of services, in need of supervision, a status offender, or delinquent except where the jurisdiction of the juvenile court has been terminated or divested;

Who is abandoned by his parent or other custodian or who by reason of the absence or physical or mental incapacity of his parents is without parental care and guardianship;

Whose custody, visitation or support is a subject of controversy or requires determination. In such cases jurisdiction shall be concurrent with and not exclusive of courts having equity jurisdiction, except as provided in §

16.1-244

;

Who is the subject of an entrustment agreement entered into pursuant to §

63.2-903

or

63.2-1817

or whose parent or parents for good cause desire to be relieved of his care and custody;

Where the termination of residual parental rights and responsibilities is sought. In such cases jurisdiction shall be concurrent with and not exclusive of courts having equity jurisdiction, as provided in §

16.1-244

;

Who is charged with a traffic infraction as defined in §

46.2-100

; or

Who is alleged to have refused to take a blood test in violation of §

18.2-268.2

.In any case in which the juvenile is alleged to have committed a violent juvenile felony enumerated in subsection B of §

16.1-269.1

, and for any charges ancillary thereto, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court shall be limited to conducting a preliminary hearing to determine if there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile committed the act alleged and that the juvenile was 16 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the alleged offense, and any matters related thereto. In any case in which the juvenile is alleged to have committed a violent juvenile felony enumerated in subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

, and for all charges ancillary thereto, if the attorney for the Commonwealth has given notice as provided in subsection C of § 16.1-269.1, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court shall be limited to conducting a preliminary hearing to determine if there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile committed the act alleged and that the juvenile was 16 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the alleged offense, and any matters related thereto. A determination by the juvenile court following a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

to certify a charge to the grand jury shall divest the juvenile court of jurisdiction over the charge and any ancillary charge. In any case in which a transfer hearing is held pursuant to subsection A of § 16.1-269.1, if the juvenile court determines to transfer the case, jurisdiction of the juvenile court over the case shall be divested as provided in §

16.1-269.6

.In all other cases involving delinquent acts, and in cases in which an ancillary charge remains after a violent juvenile felony charge has been dismissed or a violent juvenile felony has been reduced to a lesser offense not constituting a violent juvenile felony, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court shall not be divested unless there is a transfer pursuant to subsection A of § 16.1-269.1.The authority of the juvenile court to adjudicate matters involving the custody, visitation, support, control or disposition of a child shall not be limited to the consideration of petitions filed by a mother, father or legal guardian but shall include petitions filed at any time by any party with a legitimate interest therein. A party with a legitimate interest shall be broadly construed and shall include, but not be limited to, grandparents, step-grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members. A party with a legitimate interest shall not include any person (i) whose parental rights have been terminated by court order, either voluntarily or involuntarily, (ii) whose interest in the child derives from or through a person whose parental rights have been terminated by court order, either voluntarily or involuntarily, including, but not limited to, grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members, if the child subsequently has been legally adopted, except where a final order of adoption is entered pursuant to §

63.2-1241

, or (iii) who has been convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

, subsection B of §

18.2-366

, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, when the child who is the subject of the petition was conceived as a result of such violation. The authority of the juvenile court to consider a petition involving the custody of a child shall not be proscribed or limited where the child has previously been awarded to the custody of a local board of social services.

The admission of minors for inpatient treatment in a mental health facility in accordance with the provisions of Article 16 (§

16.1-335

et seq.) and the involuntary admission of a person with mental illness or judicial certification of eligibility for admission to a training center for persons with intellectual disability in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2. Jurisdiction of the involuntary admission and certification of adults shall be concurrent with the general district court.

Except as provided in subsections D and H, judicial consent to such activities as may require parental consent may be given for a child who has been separated from his parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis and is in the custody of the court when such consent is required by law.

Judicial consent for emergency surgical or medical treatment for a child who is neither married nor has ever been married, when the consent of his parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis is unobtainable because such parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis (i) is not a resident of the Commonwealth, (ii) has his whereabouts unknown, (iii) cannot be consulted with promptness, reasonable under the circumstances, or (iv) fails to give such consent or provide such treatment when requested by the judge to do so.

Any person charged with deserting, abandoning or failing to provide support for any person in violation of law.

Any parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis of a child:

Who has been abused or neglected;

Who is the subject of an entrustment agreement entered into pursuant to §

63.2-903

or

63.2-1817

or is otherwise before the court pursuant to subdivision A 4; or

Who has been adjudicated in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent, if the court finds that such person has by overt act or omission induced, caused, encouraged or contributed to the conduct of the child complained of in the petition.

Petitions filed by or on behalf of a child or such child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis for the purpose of obtaining treatment, rehabilitation or other services that are required by law to be provided for that child or such child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis. Jurisdiction in such cases shall be concurrent with and not exclusive of that of courts having equity jurisdiction as provided in §

16.1-244

.

Judicial consent to apply for a work permit for a child when such child is separated from his parents, legal guardian or other person standing in loco parentis.

The prosecution and punishment of persons charged with ill-treatment, abuse, abandonment or neglect of children or with any violation of law that causes or tends to cause a child to come within the purview of this law, or with any other offense against the person of a child. In prosecution for felonies over which the court has jurisdiction, jurisdiction shall be limited to determining whether or not there is probable cause.

All offenses in which one family or household member is charged with an offense in which another family or household member is the victim and all offenses under §

18.2-49.1

.In prosecution for felonies over which the court has jurisdiction, jurisdiction shall be limited to determining whether or not there is probable cause. Any objection based on jurisdiction under this subsection shall be made before a jury is impaneled and sworn in a jury trial or, in a nonjury trial, before the earlier of when the court begins to hear or receive evidence or the first witness is sworn, or it shall be conclusively waived for all purposes. Any such objection shall not affect or be grounds for challenging directly or collaterally the jurisdiction of the court in which the case is tried.

Petitions filed by a natural parent, whose parental rights to a child have been voluntarily relinquished pursuant to a court proceeding, to seek a reversal of the court order terminating such parental rights. No such petition shall be accepted, however, after the child has been placed in the home of adoptive parents.

Any person who seeks spousal support after having separated from his spouse. A decision under this subdivision shall not be res judicata in any subsequent action for spousal support in a circuit court. A circuit court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction in all causes of action under this subdivision.

Petitions filed for the purpose of obtaining an order of protection pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

,

16.1-253.4

, or

16.1-279.1

, and all petitions filed for the purpose of obtaining an order of protection pursuant to §

19.2-152.8

,

19.2-152.9

, or

19.2-152.10

if either the alleged victim or the respondent is a juvenile.

Any person who escapes or remains away without proper authority from a residential care facility in which he had been placed by the court or as a result of his commitment to the Virginia Department of Juvenile Justice.

Petitions for emancipation of a minor pursuant to Article 15 (§

16.1-331

et seq.).

Petitions for enforcement of administrative support orders entered pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2, or by another state in the same manner as if the orders were entered by a juvenile and domestic relations district court upon the filing of a certified copy of such order in the juvenile and domestic relations district court.

Petitions for a determination of parentage pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (§

20-49.1

et seq.) of Title 20. A circuit court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction to the extent provided for in §

20-49.2

.

[Repealed.]

Petitions filed by school boards against parents pursuant to §§

16.1-241.2

and 22.1-279.3.

Petitions to enforce any request for information or subpoena that is not complied with or to review any refusal to issue a subpoena in an administrative appeal regarding child abuse and neglect pursuant to §

63.2-1526

.

Petitions filed in connection with parental placement adoption consent hearings pursuant to §

63.2-1233

. Such proceedings shall be advanced on the docket so as to be heard by the court within 10 days of filing of the petition, or as soon thereafter as practicable so as to provide the earliest possible disposition.

Petitions filed for the purpose of obtaining the court’s assistance with the execution of consent to an adoption when the consent to an adoption is executed pursuant to the laws of another state and the laws of that state provide for the execution of consent to an adoption in the court of the Commonwealth.

Petitions filed by a juvenile seeking judicial authorization for a physician to perform an abortion if a minor elects not to seek consent of an authorized person.After a hearing, a judge shall issue an order authorizing a physician to perform an abortion, without the consent of any authorized person, if he finds that (i) the minor is mature enough and well enough informed to make her abortion decision, in consultation with her physician, independent of the wishes of any authorized person, or (ii) the minor is not mature enough or well enough informed to make such decision, but the desired abortion would be in her best interest.If the judge authorizes an abortion based on the best interests of the minor, such order shall expressly state that such authorization is subject to the physician or his agent giving notice of intent to perform the abortion; however, no such notice shall be required if the judge finds that such notice would not be in the best interest of the minor. In determining whether notice is in the best interest of the minor, the judge shall consider the totality of the circumstances; however, he shall find that notice is not in the best interest of the minor if he finds that (a) one or more authorized persons with whom the minor regularly and customarily resides is abusive or neglectful and (b) every other authorized person, if any, is either abusive or neglectful or has refused to accept responsibility as parent, legal guardian, custodian or person standing in loco parentis.The minor may participate in the court proceedings on her own behalf, and the court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor. The court shall advise the minor that she has a right to counsel and shall, upon her request, appoint counsel for her.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of this subsection shall govern proceedings relating to consent for a minor’s abortion. Court proceedings under this subsection and records of such proceedings shall be confidential. Such proceedings shall be given precedence over other pending matters so that the court may reach a decision promptly and without delay in order to serve the best interests of the minor. Court proceedings under this subsection shall be heard and decided as soon as practicable but in no event later than four days after the petition is filed.An expedited confidential appeal to the circuit court shall be available to any minor for whom the court denies an order authorizing an abortion without consent or without notice. Any such appeal shall be heard and decided no later than five days after the appeal is filed. The time periods required by this subsection shall be subject to subsection B of §

1-210

. An order authorizing an abortion without consent or without notice shall not be subject to appeal.No filing fees shall be required of the minor at trial or upon appeal.If either the original court or the circuit court fails to act within the time periods required by this subsection, the court before which the proceeding is pending shall immediately authorize a physician to perform the abortion without consent of or notice to an authorized person.Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to authorize a physician to perform an abortion on a minor in circumstances or in a manner that would be unlawful if performed on an adult woman.A physician shall not knowingly perform an abortion upon an unemancipated minor unless consent has been obtained or the minor delivers to the physician a court order entered pursuant to this section and the physician or his agent provides such notice as such order may require. However, neither consent nor judicial authorization nor notice shall be required if the minor declares that she is abused or neglected and the attending physician has reason to suspect that the minor may be an abused or neglected child as defined in §

63.2-100

and reports the suspected abuse or neglect in accordance with §

63.2-1509

; or if there is a medical emergency, in which case the attending physician shall certify the facts justifying the exception in the minor’s medical record.For purposes of this subsection:“Authorization” means the minor has delivered to the physician a notarized, written statement signed by an authorized person that the authorized person knows of the minor’s intent to have an abortion and consents to such abortion being performed on the minor.“Authorized person” means (i) a parent or duly appointed legal guardian or custodian of the minor or (ii) a person standing in loco parentis, including, but not limited to, a grandparent or adult sibling with whom the minor regularly and customarily resides and who has care and control of the minor. Any person who knows he is not an authorized person and who knowingly and willfully signs an authorization statement consenting to an abortion for a minor is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.“Consent” means that (i) the physician has given notice of intent to perform the abortion and has received authorization from an authorized person, or (ii) at least one authorized person is present with the minor seeking the abortion and provides written authorization to the physician, which shall be witnessed by the physician or an agent thereof. In either case, the written authorization shall be incorporated into the minor’s medical record and maintained as a part thereof.“Medical emergency” means any condition which, on the basis of the physician’s good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant minor as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.“Notice of intent to perform the abortion” means that (i) the physician or his agent has given actual notice of his intention to perform such abortion to an authorized person, either in person or by telephone, at least 24 hours previous to the performance of the abortion or (ii) the physician or his agent, after a reasonable effort to notify an authorized person, has mailed notice to an authorized person by certified mail, addressed to such person at his usual place of abode, with return receipt requested, at least 72 hours prior to the performance of the abortion.“Perform an abortion” means to interrupt or terminate a pregnancy by any surgical or nonsurgical procedure or to induce a miscarriage as provided in §

18.2-72

,

18.2-73

, or

18.2-74

.“Unemancipated minor” means a minor who has not been emancipated by (i) entry into a valid marriage, even though the marriage may have been terminated by dissolution; (ii) active duty with any of the Armed Forces of the United States; (iii) willingly living separate and apart from his or her parents or guardian, with the consent or acquiescence of the parents or guardian; or (iv) entry of an order of emancipation pursuant to Article 15 (§

16.1-331

et seq.).

Petitions filed pursuant to Article 17 (§

16.1-349

et seq.) relating to standby guardians for minor children.

Petitions involving minors filed pursuant to §

32.1-45.1

relating to obtaining a blood specimen or test results.

Petitions filed pursuant to §

16.1-283.3

for review of voluntary agreements for continuation of services and support for persons who meet the eligibility criteria for the Fostering Futures program set forth in §

63.2-919

.The ages specified in this law refer to the age of the child at the time of the acts complained of in the petition.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no fees shall be charged by a sheriff for the service of any process in a proceeding pursuant to subdivision A 3, except as provided in subdivision A 6 of §

17.1-272

, or subsection B, D, M, or R.Notwithstanding the provisions of §

18.2-71

, any physician who performs an abortion in violation of subsection W shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.Upon certification by the juvenile and domestic relations district court of any felony charge and ancillary misdemeanor charge committed by an adult or when an appeal of a conviction or adjudication of delinquency of an offense in the juvenile and domestic relations district court is noted, jurisdiction as to such charges shall vest in the circuit court, unless such case is reopened pursuant to §

16.1-133.1

; a final judgment, order, or decree is modified, vacated, or suspended pursuant to Supreme Court of Virginia Rule 1:1; or the appeal has been withdrawn in the juvenile and domestic relations district court within 10 days pursuant to §

16.1-133

.

2a.

Who is at risk of being abused or neglected by a parent or custodian who has been adjudicated as having abused or neglected another child in the care of the parent or custodian;

A1.

Making specific findings of fact required by state or federal law to enable a child to apply for or receive a state or federal benefit. For the purposes of this subsection only, when the court has obtained jurisdiction over the case of any child, the court may continue to exercise its jurisdiction until such person reaches 21 years of age, for the purpose of entering findings of fact or amending past orders, to include findings of fact necessary for the person to petition the federal government for status as a special immigrant juvenile, as defined by 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(27)(J).

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-158; 1956, c. 555; 1960, c. 388; 1968, c. 225; 1970, cc. 232, 600; 1973, c. 440; 1976, cc. 42, 324; 1977, cc. 525, 559; 1978, c. 648; 1979, cc. 597, 605, 628; 1980, cc. 527, 529; 1981, cc. 454, 475, 488, 491, 501, 502, 510; 1982, c. 46; 1983, c. 280; 1984, cc. 631, 645, 651, 665, 669; 1985, c. 270; 1986, cc. 59, 506; 1987, c. 632; 1988, cc. 797, 906; 1989, cc. 368, 733; 1990, cc. 704, 975; 1991, cc. 511, 715; 1992, cc. 585, 742; 1994, cc. 575, 719, 813, 859, 949; 1995, cc. 7, 665, 772, 826, 852; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, cc. 690, 708; 1998, c. 829; 1999, cc. 697, 721, 1028; 2000, c. 830; 2003, cc. 229, 960, 962; 2004, c. 588; 2005, cc. 716, 839, 890; 2007, cc. 284, 370; 2008, cc. 164, 201; 2010, c. 402; 2012, cc. 424, 476, 507, 637; 2014, c. 653; 2017, c. 623; 2019, cc. 27, 412, 631; 2020, cc. 95, 732, 987, 988; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 187, 286.

Cross references.

As to notice of right to counsel, see §

16.1-266

.

As to the one year deadline for claims of error or defect, see §

16.1-272.1

.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to visitation of child placed in foster care, see §

63.2-912

.

As to testimony of child by use of two-way closed-circuit television in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1521

. As to admission of out-of-court statements made by certain children in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1522

. As to use of videotaped statements of certain children who are complaining witnesses in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1523

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2003, cc. 960 and 962, cl. 2 provides: “That if the amendments made by this act to §

16.1-241

are ever temporarily or permanently restrained or enjoined by judicial order, the provisions of §

16.1-241

shall be enforced as though the amendments were not enacted; however, if such temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction is ever stayed or dissolved, or otherwise ceases to have effect, § 16.1-241, as amended by this act, shall have full force and effect.”

Acts 2019, cc. 412 and 631 added subsection A1, which grants the juvenile and domestic relations district court’s jurisdiction to make “specific findings of fact required by state or federal law to enable a child to apply for or receive a state or federal benefit.” The
Canales v. Orellana
, 67 Va. App. 759, 800 S.E.2d 208 (2017) decision, was reached before the 2019 acts became effective.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “terminated or divested” for “terminated under the provisions of §

16.1-269.6

” in subdivision A 1, added the present second and third paragraphs of subdivision A 6, and substituted “or subsection B, D, M or R” for “subsections M or R” in the last paragraph.

The 1998 amendment

added subsection W.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by cc. 697 and 721 are identical, and added “and” at the end of subdivision A 5; in subsection D, in clause (ii), inserted “has” and deleted “is” preceding “unknown,” and deleted “he” at the beginning of clause (iii); added “or” at the end of subdivision F 2; and deleted the former fourth sentence in the second paragraph of subsection J, which read: “For purposes of this subsection, ‘family or household member,’ as defined in §

16.1-228

, shall also be construed to include parent and child, stepparent and stepchild, brothers and sisters, and grandparent and grandchild, regardless of whether such persons reside in the same home.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 1028 inserted “§

18.2-63

” in clause (ii) of the concluding paragraph of subsection A.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “§ 63.1-219.48” for “§ 63.1-231” at the end of clause (i) in the concluding paragraph of subsection A; and substituted “§ 63.1-219.40” for “§ 63.1-22.3” at the end of the first sentence in subsection U.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 229, in the first paragraph following subdivision A 6, twice substituted “14” for “fourteen,” and in the third paragraph thereof, rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “A party with a legitimate interest shall not include any person (i) whose parental rights have been terminated by court order, either voluntarily or involuntarily, or any other person whose interest in the child derives from or through such person whose parental rights have been so terminated, including, but not limited to, grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members, if the child subsequently has been legally adopted, except where a final order of adoption is entered pursuant to §

63.2-1241

, or (ii) who has been convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

or subsection B of §

18.2-366

when the child who is the subject of the petition was conceived as a result of such violation”; substituted “10” for “ten” in subdivision U; and in subdivision V, in the paragraph defining “Notice of intent to perform the abortion,” substituted “24” for “twenty-four,” and “72” for “seventy-two.”

The 2003 amendments by cc. 960 and 962 are identical, and substituted “14” for “fourteen” throughout the section; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision D (i); substituted “that are” for “which are” in subdivision G; substituted “that causes” for “which causes” in subdivision I; substituted “10” for “ten” in subdivision U; and rewrote subdivision V.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 588 inserted “except as provided in subdivision A 6 of §

17.1-272

” near the end in the next-to-last paragraph of subsection W.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote subsection B and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “subsection B of §

1-210

” for “§ 1-13.3:1” in the sixth paragraph of subsection V; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted “or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction” in the last paragraph of subsection A; made a related change; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 284 and 370 are identical, and added subsection X.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 164 and 201 are identical, and added the second sentence of subsection Q.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 402 deleted former subsection X, which read: “Petitions filed pursuant to §

18.2-370.5

for an order allowing the petitioner to enter and be present on school or child day center property. In such cases jurisdiction shall be concurrent with and not exclusive of circuit courts.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 424 added subsection V and redesignated former subsection V as W; substituted “subsection W” for “subsection V” in the last paragraph, and made related and minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “persons with intellectual disability in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2” for “persons with mental retardation in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 1 (§

37.2-100

et seq.) and 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2012 amendment by c. 637 added “,

16.1-253.4

, or

16.1-279.1

, and all petitions filed for the purpose of obtaining an order of protection pursuant to §

19.2-152.8

,

19.2-152.9

, or

19.2-152.10

if either the alleged victim or the respondent is a juvenile” at the end of subsection M; repealed former subsection R, whch read: “Petitions for the purpose of obtaining an emergency protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253.4

.”; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 653 in the last paragraph of subsection A inserted “step-grandparents” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, added subdivision A 7, and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 27 added subsection Y.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 412 and 631 are identical, and added subsection A1.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 95 and 732 are identical, and inserted subsection Z.

The 2020 amendment by c. 987, in subsection A in the paragraph after subdivision 7, substituted “16 years” for “14 years” in the first and second sentences; and in subsection W in the last sentence of the third paragraph, substituted “(a)” and “(b)” for “(i)” and “(ii),” respectively.

The 2020 amendment by c. 988, in subsection A in the paragraph after subdivision 7, substituted “16 years” for “14 years” in the first and second sentences.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 187, effective July 1, 2021, added the last paragraph in the section.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 286, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in subsection A1.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 1994 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (1994).

For 1995 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 951 (1995).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For an article, “Blood Ties: A Rationale for Child Visitation by Legal Strangers,” see 55 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 351 (1998).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 7 Family Support Obligations. § 7.5 Contempt. Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-155. Petition for Protective Order—Family Abuse, et seq.

§ 16.1-241.1.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 305.

§ 16.1-241.2.
Proceedings against certain parents.

Upon the failure of a parent to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-279.3, the school board may, by petition to the juvenile and domestic relations court, proceed against such parent for willful and unreasonable refusal to participate in efforts to improve the student’s behavior as follows:

If the court finds that the parent has willfully and unreasonably failed to meet, pursuant to a request of the principal as set forth in subsection D of § 22.1-279.3, to review the school board’s standards of student conduct and the parent’s responsibility to assist the school in disciplining the student, maintaining order, or ensuring the child’s school attendance, and to discuss improvement of the child’s behavior, school attendance, or educational progress, it may order the parent to so meet; or

If the court finds that the parent has willfully and unreasonably failed to accompany a suspended student to meet with school officials pursuant to subsection F of § 22.1-279.3, or upon the student receiving a second suspension or being expelled, it may order (i) the student or his parent to participate in such programs or such treatment as the court deems appropriate to improve the student’s behavior, including, but not limited to, extended day programs and summer school or other education programs and counseling, or (ii) the student or his parent to be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court deems appropriate for the supervision, care, and rehabilitation of the student or his parent; in addition, the court may order the parent to pay a civil penalty not to exceed $500.The court may use its contempt power to enforce any order entered under this section.

The civil penalties established pursuant to this section shall be enforceable in the juvenile and domestic relations court or its successor in interest in which the student’s school is located and shall be paid into a fund maintained by the appropriate local governing body to support programs or treatments designed to improve the behavior and school attendance of students as described in subdivision 2 of subsection G of § 22.1-279.3. Upon the failure to pay any civil penalties imposed by this section and § 22.1-279.3, the attorney for the appropriate county, city, or town shall enforce the collection of such civil penalties.

For the purposes of this section and § 22.1-279.3, “parent” or “parents” means any parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person having control or charge of a child.

History.

1994, c. 813; 1995, c. 852; 1996, c. 771; 2004, c. 573.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 573, in subdivision A 1, deleted “and” preceding “maintaining order,” inserted “or ensuring the child’s school attendance,” and substituted “school attendance” for “and”; inserted “the language “including, but not limited to . . . and counseling” in clause (i) of subdivision A 2; substituted “may” for “shall not” in the last paragraph of subsection A; and inserted “and school attendance” in the first sentence of subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 16.1-241.3.
Newborn children; substance abuse.

Upon the filing of a petition alleging that an investigation has been commenced in response to a report of suspected abuse or neglect of the child based upon a factor specified in subsection B of §

63.2-1509

, the court may enter any order authorized pursuant to this chapter which the court deems necessary to protect the health and welfare of the child pending final disposition of the investigation pursuant to Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or other proceedings brought pursuant to this chapter. Such orders may include, but shall not be limited to, an emergency removal order pursuant to §

16.1-251

, a preliminary protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253

or an order authorized pursuant to subdivisions A 1 through 4 of §

16.1-278.2

. The fact that an order was entered pursuant to this section shall not be admissible as evidence in any criminal, civil or administrative proceeding other than a proceeding to enforce the order.

The order shall be effective for a limited duration not to exceed the period of time necessary to conclude the investigation and any proceedings initiated pursuant to Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2, but shall be a final order subject to appeal.

History.

1998, cc. 704, 716; 2002, c. 860; 2012, cc. 504, 640.

Cross references.

As to filing of a petition pursuant to §

16.1-241.3

by a local social services department upon a report or complaint based upon one of the factors in §

63.2-1509

B, see §

63.2-1505

B 1 and §

63.2-1506

B 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 716, cl. 2 provides: “That on or before October 1, 1999, and each year thereafter for the following two years, the Department of Social Services shall report to the General Assembly on the implementation of this act. The report shall include data compiled in conjunction with the State Board of Medicine, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Department of Behavioral Health and Development Services] and the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court, on the numbers of mothers and infants affected, the number of reports made pursuant to subsection A 1 of [former] § 63.1-248.3 [see now §

63.2-1509

] and investigations resulting therefrom, the outcome of those investigations, the number of petitions filed with the juvenile courts pursuant to §

16.1-241.3

and the disposition on those petitions, the types of treatments and other services provided and such other information as representatives of those departments having expertise in perinatal addiction or abuse and neglect cases deem appropriate to a thorough evaluation of this act. For purposes of preparing this report, the departments and offices shall establish procedures which are necessary and appropriate to track cases involving suspected addiction of newborn infants during the period to be covered by the report.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 860 substituted “subsection B” for “subsection A 1” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 504 and 640 are identical, and in the first paragraph, deleted “within twenty-one days of a child’s birth” following “filing of a petition” in the first sentence and substituted “subdivisions A 1 through 4 of §

16.1-278.2

” for “subdivisions 1 through 4 of subsection A of §

16.1-278.2

” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.